Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.370

Medical, surgical or hospital treatment—Reimbursement.

If, in addition to monetary assistance, benefits, or other temporary or permanent relief, the United States or any agent thereof, will reimburse an emergency worker or his or her dependents for medical, surgical or hospital treatment, or any combination thereof, furnished to the injured emergency worker, the emergency worker has no right to receive similar medical, surgical or hospital treatment as provided in this chapter, but the department, may furnish a medical, surgical or hospital treatment as part of the compensation provided under the provisions of this chapter and apply to the United States or its agent for the reimbursement which will be made to the emergency worker or his or her dependents. As a condition to the furnishing of such medical, surgical or hospital treatment, the department shall require the emergency worker and his dependents to assign to the state of Washington, for the purpose of reimbursing for any medical, surgical or hospital treatment furnished or to be furnished by the state, any claim or right such emergency worker or his or her dependents may have to reimbursement from the United States or any agent thereof.

[ 1986 c 266 s 41; 1984 c 38 s 38; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 39; 1953 c 223 s 21.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.